Hawaii statutes.
[§527‑5] Transfer on death deed
authorized. An individual may transfer property, effective at the
transferor's death, to one or more beneficiaries by a transfer on death deed;
provided that, with respect to property of which any portion is registered in
the land court, transfer is subject to the requirement in section 527‑13(a)(1)
regarding submittal of a petition to the land court. [L 2011, c 173, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next